Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.090

Air pollution reduction—Variances from ASTM.

The directors of the departments of ecology and agriculture may grant a variance from ASTM motor fuel specifications if necessary to produce lower emission motor fuels.

[ 1991 c 199 s 231.]

NOTES:

Finding—1991 c 199: See note following RCW 70A.15.1005.

Effective dates—1991 c 199: See RCW 70A.15.9003.